Missouri, session 2026, HB5.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
Section 5.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item or
items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 2
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. Part 3 of
this act shall consist of guidance to the Office of Administration
in implementing the appropriations found in Part 1 and Part 2 of
this act. An appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part
of a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall be
construed to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the
stated appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation
identified as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an
addition to any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal
periods beyond June 30, 2026. Any amount identified as one-
time may, however, be requested in any future fiscal period as a
new decision item.
Section 5.005. To the Office of Administration
For the Commissioner’s Office, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 5.150, and further
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from personal
service to expense and equipment, and five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.005, 5.015, 5.020,
5.025, 5.030, 5.055, 5.070, 5.085, and 5.100
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,191,714
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ......................................................................................................................6,092
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 84,348
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,282,154
For the Office of Equal Opportunity, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................446,228
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 81,361
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................527,589
For the purpose of a Prescription Drug Monitoring Program, provided
twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 3
Personal Service ..................................................................................................269,604
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 1,197,223
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..........................................................................1,466,827
For the America 250 Missouri Commission
Personal Service ....................................................................................................65,000
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 372,162
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .................................................................. 437,162
Total (Not to exceed 23.50 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,713,732
Section 5.015. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 5.150, and further
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service to expense and equipment, and five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.005, 5.015, 5.020,
5.025, 5.030, 5.055, 5.070, 5.085, and 5.100
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,029,930
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 132,436
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,162,366
For the implementation of a new enterprise resource planning system,
provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service to expense and equipment
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,777,879
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 8,409,993
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .................................................................. 13,187,872
Total (Not to exceed 111.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$17,350,238
Section 5.020. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Budget and Planning, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.150, and
further provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.005,
5.015, 5.020, 5.025, 5.030, 5.055, 5.070, 5.085, and 5.100
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,500,485
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 144,913
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 25.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,645,398

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 4
Section 5.025. To the Office of Administration
For the Information Technology Services Division, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
5.150, and provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between and within personal service and expense and
equipment within Section 5.025, and further provided that
twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed from this section
to Section 5.030 between the general revenue fund, twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
5.030 between federal funds, and twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.030 between
other funds, and five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 5.005, 5.015, 5.020, 5.025, 5.030, 5.055, 5.070, 5.085,
and 5.100
For Information Technology Services Division billings
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$12,462,223
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 46,987,448
From Missouri Revolving Information Technology Trust Fund (1980) ...................59,449,671
For providing state-wide information technology applications,
infrastructure, and administrative support
Personal Service ...............................................................................................7,775,780
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 25,919,723
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................33,695,503
Personal Service ..................................................................................................141,400
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 790,000
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .........................................................................931,400
For a cloud infrastructure monitoring and management project
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................208,512
For a network resiliency and operations project
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,500,000
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,210,329
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 7,116,934
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ..........................................12,327,263

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 5
For funding information technology security enhancements
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,674,924
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 17,222,897
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................20,897,821
For maintenance and support of a citizen portal project
Personal Service ...............................................................................................6,705,000
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 21,134,095
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................27,839,095
For a key management system
Personal Service ..................................................................................................380,000
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 1,020,000
From General Revenue (1101).....................................................................................1,400,000
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue ................................................................................................6,000,000
For implementation of a secure, cloud-based data warehouse solution
which will allow for programmatic and citizen data integration
and sharing across the consolidated and non-consolidated
agencies, per a memorandum of understanding between the
Missouri House of Representatives, the Missouri Senate, the
Office of Administration, and the Judiciary
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,000,000
Total (Not to exceed 397.00 F.T.E.) ......................................................................$167,249,265
Section 5.030. To the Office of Administration
For the Information Technology Services Division, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
5.150, and provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between and within personal service and expense and
equipment within Section 5.030, and further provided that
twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between and
within departments’ general revenue funds, twenty-five percent
(25%) flexibility is allowed between and within departments’
federal funds, and twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between and within departments’ other funds, and five

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 6
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.005,
5.015, 5.020, 5.025, 5.030, 5.055, 5.070, 5.085, and 5.100
For the Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
Personal Service ................................................................................................$777,665
Expense and Equipment (including $3,331,900 one-time) ..................... 4,738,740
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,516,405
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ............................................4,661,090
From Other Funds (Various) ...........................................................................................350,638
For the Department of Higher Education and Workforce Development
Personal Service ..................................................................................................815,698
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 1,548,376
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,364,074
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ............................................2,730,413
From Other Funds (Various) (including $1,200,000 one-time) ...................................1,295,749
For the Department of Revenue
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,588,803
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 22,285,453
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................27,874,256
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ..........................................................2
From Other Funds (Various) ......................................................................................30,272,041
For the Office of Administration
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,554,949
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 7,255,465
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................10,810,414
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ..........................................................2
From Other Funds (Various) ...........................................................................................559,446
For the Department of Agriculture
Personal Service ..................................................................................................362,555
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 416,777
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................779,332
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ..........................................................2
From Other Funds (Various) ...........................................................................................662,362
For the Department of Natural Resources
Personal Service ..................................................................................................654,593
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 955,942

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 7
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,610,535
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ............................................2,050,813
From Other Funds (Various) (including $2,013,744 one-time) ...................................8,863,012
For the Department of Economic Development
Personal Service ..................................................................................................320,256
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 518,315
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................838,571
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ...............................................375,759
From Other Funds (Various) ........................................................................................1,034,786
For the Department of Commerce and Insurance
Personal Service ......................................................................................................1,361
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 253,068
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................254,429
From Other Funds (Various) ........................................................................................5,852,957
For the Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
Personal Service .............................................................................................................1
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 292,528
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................292,529
From Federal Funds (Various) ...................................................................................30,639,441
From Other Funds (Various) ......................................................................................40,508,708
For the Department of Public Safety
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,363,508
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,034,910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,398,418
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) .................................................48,670
From Other Funds (Various) (including $1,478,171 one-time) ...................................6,473,589
For the Department of Corrections
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,060,700
Expense and Equipment (including $7,750,000 one-time) ...................... 18,577,735
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................21,638,435
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ...................................................7,715
From Other Funds (Various) ...........................................................................................285,186
For the Department of Health and Senior Services
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,477,367

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 8
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,202,477
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,679,844
From Federal Funds (Various) ...................................................................................22,870,043
From Other Funds (Various) ........................................................................................2,864,860
For the Department of Mental Health
Personal Service ...............................................................................................6,900,464
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 4,779,851
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................11,680,315
From OA Information Technology Federal Fund (1165) ............................................5,724,626
For the Department of Social Services
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,106,375
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 5,438,200
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................9,544,575
From Federal Funds (Various) ............................................................................ 37,572,328
Total (Not to exceed 562.49 F.T.E.) ......................................................................$305,986,370
Section 5.035. To the Office of Administration
For the Information Technology Services Division
For the centralized telephone billing system
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Revolving Information Technology Trust Fund (1980) .................$44,700,776
Section 5.040. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the E–
Procurement and State Technology Fund
From Missouri Revolving Information Technology Trust Fund (1980) .................$13,200,000
For receiving and expending funds for E–Procurement activities
From E–Procurement and State Technology Fund (1495) ................................. 5,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$18,200,000
Section 5.045. To the Office of Administration
For the Information Technology Services Division
For replacement of the statewide accounting and budget systems,
including consulting and procurement, per a memorandum of
understanding between the Missouri House of Representatives,
the Missouri Senate, the Office of Administration, and the
Judiciary, provided that $1,000,000 of such funds appropriated

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 9
within this section shall be used for an independent third-party
monitoring and compliance consultant, which shall be under the
oversight of the Governor, that specializes in implementation of
state and local government technology to be paid only upon the
House Budget Committee Chair and the Senate Appropriations
Committee Chair receiving and providing signed
acknowledgement of quarterly technology review reports from
said consultant that include information on each task described in
the scope of work and such scope of work shall include the review
of the new statewide accounting and budget systems, known as
MOVERS, the delivery of a comprehensive review of the project
including all vendors’ roles in the project, the report on the status
of the replacement program project’s implementation and
provide recommendations and a methodology for replacing the
project, vendors, or governance, including additional
implementation support when appropriate, and further provided
that no funds shall be expended for the new statewide accounting
budget systems currently known as the MOVERS system until
such contract for an independent third-party consultant has been
executed and signed
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$34,029,640
From E-Procurement and State Technology Fund (1495) .................................. 8,200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$42,229,640
Section 5.046. To the Office of Administration
For the Information Technology Services Division
For modernization of asset management and portfolio management
implemented through a statewide solution that is native to the
statewide citizen engagement platform
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ........................................................................$4,000,000
Section 5.050. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as are necessary for allocation of costs to other funds in
support of the implementation of a new enterprise resource
planning system.
From Other Funds (Various) ......................................................................................$6,000,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 10
Section 5.055. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Personnel, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 5.150, and further provided
five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service
and expense and equipment, and five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 5.005, 5.015, 5.020, 5.025, 5.030,
5.055, 5.070, 5.085, and 5.100
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,759,172
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 3,091,300
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................7,850,472
Personal Service ..................................................................................................157,280
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 471,555
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust
Fund (1505) ........................................................................................................628,835
Personal Service ....................................................................................................40,676
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 3,600
From Missouri Revolving Information Technology Trust Fund
(1980) ...................................................................................................................44,276
For the Center for Operational Excellence
Personal Service ..................................................................................................585,453
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 128,022
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................713,475
For a Statewide Employee Referral Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................202,000
For data analytics and qualitative analysis based on available hiring data
to enhance both job fit in the hiring process and employee
retention by developing algorithms to detect early signs of
employee disengagement, accompanied with personalized and
practical feedback to substantially reduce employee turnover rate
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .................................................................. 1,342,088
Total (Not to exceed 79.72 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$10,781,146
Section 5.060. To the Office of Administration
For the Statewide Rewards and Recognition Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,001,963

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 11
Section 5.065. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Personnel
For an employee suggestion program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$20,190
Section 5.070. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Purchasing and Materials Management, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 5.150, and further provided five percent (5%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between Sections
5.005, 5.015, 5.020, 5.025, 5.030, 5.055, 5.070, 5.085, and 5.100
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,055,571
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 84,678
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,140,249
Personal Service
From Department of Labor and Industrial Relations Administrative
Fund (1122) ............................................................................................................3,484
From Department of Mental Health – Federal Funds (1148) ...........................................13,427
From Job Development and Training Fund (1155) ...........................................................1,713
From DNR Cost Allocation Fund (1500) ..........................................................................8,200
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ..........................................9,087
From DCI Administrative Fund (1503) .............................................................................2,801
From Department of Economic Development Administrative Fund
(1547) ......................................................................................................................2,164
From Agriculture Protection Fund (1970) ......................................................... 2,139
Total (Not to exceed 43.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,183,264
Section 5.075. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Purchasing and Materials Management
For refunding bid and performance bonds
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust
Fund (1505) ....................................................................................................$3,000,000
Section 5.080. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Asset Management

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 12
For authority to spend donated funds to support renovations and
operations of the Governor’s Mansion
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) .....................................$120,000
Section 5.085. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Asset Management
For any and all expenditures necessary for funding the operations of the
Board of Public Buildings, state-owned and leased office
buildings, institutional facilities, laboratories, and support
facilities, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.005,
5.015, 5.020, 5.025, 5.030, 5.055, 5.070, 5.085, and 5.100
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$27,420,409
Expense and Equipment (including $1,482,300 one-time) ..................... 105,366,204
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) (Not to
exceed 491.25 F.T.E.) ................................................................................$132,786,613
Section 5.090. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Asset Management
For funding expenditures associated with the State Capitol Commission
Expense and Equipment
From State Capitol Commission Fund (1745) ................................................................$25,000
Section 5.095. To the Board of Public Buildings
For the Office of Administration
For the Division of Facilities Management, Design and Construction
Asset Management
For modifications, replacement, repair costs, and other support services
at state-operated facilities or institutions when recovery is
obtained from a third party including energy rebates or disaster
recovery
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ..................................$2,000,000
Section 5.100. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.150, and

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 13
further provided that no more than five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between Sections
5.005, 5.015, 5.020, 5.025, 5.030, 5.055, 5.070, 5.085, and 5.100
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,279,692
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 214,631
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,494,323
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,123,933
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 979,740
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505) ...................................................................................................... 5,103,673
Total (Not to exceed 104.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$6,597,996
Section 5.105. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the operation of the State Agency for Surplus Property
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,106,314
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 646,107
From Federal Surplus Property Fund (1407) (Not to exceed 18.00
F.T.E.) ............................................................................................................$1,752,421
Section 5.110. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the Fixed Price Vehicle Program
Expense and Equipment
From Federal Surplus Property Fund (1407) .............................................................$1,495,994
Section 5.115. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Department of Social Services for the heating assistance
program, as provided by Section 34.032, RSMo
From Federal Surplus Property Fund (1407) ..................................................................$30,000
Section 5.120. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the disbursement of surplus property sales receipts
From Proceeds of Surplus Property Sales Fund (1710) ................................................$299,894
Section 5.125. To the Office of Administration

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 14
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to various
state agency funds
From Proceeds of Surplus Property Sales Fund (1710) .............................................$4,000,000
Section 5.130. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Property Preservation Fund
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) .................................................$15,000,000
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505) ...............................................................................................................5,000,000
From State Facilities Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ......................... 5,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$25,000,000
Section 5.135. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the repair or replacement of state-owned or leased facilities that have
suffered damage from natural or man-made events or for the
defeasance of outstanding debt secured by the damaged facilities
when a notice of coverage has been issued by the Commissioner
of Administration, as provided by Sections 37.410 through
37.413, RSMo
From State Property Preservation Fund (1128) .......................................................$25,000,000
Section 5.140. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For rebillable expenses and for the replacement or repair of damaged
equipment when recovery is obtained from a third party
Expense and Equipment
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505) ...........................................................................................................$18,250,000
Section 5.145. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Sections 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ($10,000,000 one-time) ................................$28,625,000
From Other Funds (Various) ............................................................................... 15,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$43,625,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 15
Section 5.150. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 5.155. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For the payment of claims and expenses as provided by Section 105.711
et seq., RSMo, and for purchasing insurance against any or all
liability of the State of Missouri or any agency, officer, or
employee thereof
From State Legal Expense Fund (1692) ................................................................$100,000,236
Section 5.160. To the Office of Administration
For the Administrative Hearing Commission, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.150, and
further provided twenty percent (20%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,282,365
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................25,301
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 62,587
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,370,253
Personal Service ....................................................................................................96,176
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ...................................................................................................... 1,332
From Administrative Hearing Commission Educational Due Process
Hearing Fund (1818) .............................................................................................97,508
Personal Service ..................................................................................................143,716
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 82,800
From Missouri Veterans’ Health and Care Fund (1606) .................................... 226,516
Total (Not to exceed 18.50 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,694,277
Section 5.165. To the Office of Administration
For funding the Office of Child Advocate, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.150, and

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 16
further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$429,855
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 23,934
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................453,789
Personal Service ..................................................................................................172,609
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 15,243
From Office of Administration - Federal Fund (1135) ........................................ 187,852
Total (Not to exceed 8.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$641,641
Section 5.170. To the Office of Administration
For the administrative, promotional, and programmatic costs of the
Children’s Trust Fund Board as provided by Section 210.173,
RSMo, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and
provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
between expense and equipment and program disbursements
Personal Service ................................................................................................$580,842
Expense and Equipment ...................................................................................1,013,978
For Program Disbursements .............................................................................. 3,400,000
From Children’s Trust Fund (1694) .............................................................................4,994,820
From Office of Administration Federal Stimulus 2021 Fund (2445) ..........................2,000,000
For contracts with community-based programs designed to prevent child
sexual abuse, to be competitively awarded in accordance with
Section 210.172, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................500,000
For the purpose of evidence-based home visitation programs
From Office of Administration - Federal Fund (1135) ................................................1,065,600
For the purpose of funding Regional Collective Impact Hubs, provided
that each site will coordinate home visiting providers in their
catchment area, establish a referral system, provide quality
improvement and training, and further provided that all high-risk
families are served
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 17
For a grant to a non-profit organization with a statewide service area and
mission that encompasses supporting families’ access to quality
childcare and early education. Such funds shall be used to
develop and implement community plans to improve access to
quality childcare and early education in conjunction with local
stakeholders, with priority given to rural communities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................900,000
For a child care cost-sharing program for families with household
incomes not to exceed the amount provided in section 166.700,
RSMO., provided that families who otherwise have access to
subsidized child care through the state shall be ineligible,
provided that the program shall prioritize serving eligible
families with the lowest household incomes, areas of the state
designated as child care deserts, and supporting access to infant
and toddler child care, and further provided that the state subsidy
under this program shall be no greater than 40% of the child care
subsidy payment under the Office of Childhood child care
subsidy program, and further provided that in order to be eligible
for subsidy under this section the employer or community must
contribute at least 30% of the cost of child care, and further
provided that at that at least 95% of program funds shall be used
to directly subsidize child care
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,000,000
For administering evidence-based home visitation programs supporting
Missouri families at greatest risk for poor health outcomes and/or
involvement in the child welfare system
Personal Service ..................................................................................................200,000
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 1,834
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................201,834
Personal Service ..................................................................................................200,000
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 1,834
From Office of Administration - Federal Fund (1135) ...................................................201,834
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,611,500
From Office of Administration - Federal Fund (1135) ................................................6,551,508

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 18
For providing evidence-based home visiting services to at-risk, low-
income families
Program Distribution
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund (1199) ........................... 2,900,000
Total (Not to exceed 12.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$29,927,096
Section 5.175. To the Office of Administration
For funding the Governor’s Council on Disability, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.150, and
further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$246,619
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 26,134
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 4.00 F.T.E.) ...............................$272,753
Section 5.180. To the Office of Administration
For those services provided through the Office of Administration that are
contracted with and reimbursed by the Board of Trustees of the
Missouri Public Entity Risk Management Fund as provided by
Chapter 537, RSMo
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,034,872
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 10,500
From Office of Administration Revolving Administrative Trust Fund
(1505) (Not to exceed 14.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................$1,045,372
Section 5.185. To the Office of Administration
For the Missouri Ethics Commission, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,604,587
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 296,361
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 24.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$1,900,948
Section 5.190. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of rent by the state for state agencies occupying
Board of Public Buildings revenue bond financed buildings.
Funds are to be used for principal, interest, bond issuance costs,

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 19
and reserve fund requirements of Board of Public Buildings
bonds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$60,405,232
From State Parks Earnings Fund (1415) ......................................................................3,806,360
From Facilities Maintenance Reserve Fund (1124) ............................................ 11,621,344
Total .........................................................................................................................$75,832,936
Section 5.195. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For annual fees, arbitrage rebate, refunding, defeasance, and related
expenses of House Bill 5 debt
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$30,654
Section 5.200. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of the state’s lease/purchase debt requirements
From State Facility Maintenance and Operation Fund (1501) ..................................$2,408,357
Section 5.205. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For debt service and all related expenses associated with the State
Historical Society Project bonds issued through the Missouri
Development Finance Board
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,292,169
Section 5.210. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds to the Fulton State Hospital Bond Fund for debt
payments on bonds issued by the Missouri Development Finance
Board pursuant to a finance agreement between the Missouri
Development Finance Board, Office of Administration, and
Department of Mental Health for a project to replace Fulton State
Hospital, not to exceed $220 million in total bonding principal
and for related expenses
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,696,350
Section 5.215. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For debt service related to the Fulton State Hospital bonds
From Fulton State Hospital Bond and Interest Fund (1396)......................................$8,702,500

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 20
Section 5.220. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For debt service and all related expenses associated with the Missouri
State Fair project bonds issued through the Missouri Department
Finance Board, provided one-hundred percent (100%) flexibility
is allowed between the General Revenue Fund and other funds in
this section, and further provided that the General Revenue Fund
shall be the debited fund of last resort for all payments
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,199,999
From State Fair Building Revolving Fund (1341) ............................................... 1
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,200,000
Section 5.225. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For Debt Management
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$83,300
Section 5.230. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For the Bartle Hall Convention Center expansion, operations,
development, or maintenance in Kansas City pursuant to Sections
67.638 through 67.641, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 5.235. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For the maintenance of the Jackson County Sports Complex pursuant to
Sections 67.638 through 67.641, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
For a grant to a Missouri-based, not-for-profit organization that is
contracted with the International Federation of Association
Football and responsible for planning and logistics related to the
2026 World Cup activities in and around any city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 17,500,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$20,500,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 21
Section 5.240. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Road Fund I-70 Project Fund in pursuant to a financing
agreement between the Commission and the Office of
Administration. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest
and moneys earned on such investments shall be deposited to the
credit of the OA I-70 Project Fund and any moneys remaining in
the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert back to the
credit of the general revenue fund
From OA I-70 Project Fund (1334) ....................................................................$1,375,859,705
Section 5.245. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Road Fund I-44 Improvement Fund pursuant to a financing
agreement between the Commission and the Office of
Administration. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any interest
and moneys earned on such investments shall be deposited to the
credit of the I-44 Improvement Fund and any moneys remaining
in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert back to the
credit of the general revenue fund
From I-44 Improvement Fund (1332) ....................................................................$213,750,000
Section 5.250. To the Office of Administration
For the Sheriff’s Retirement Fund authorized in Section 57.952, RSMo.,
provided that the Missouri Sheriff's Retirement System shall
divest from all of its global public equity investments in China,
and further provided that the System not make any new or
additional global public equity investments in China, and that
Taiwan shall be excluded from the definition of China, and
further provided that no system funds shall be used to make
political campaign contributions, and further provided that the
employee contribution rate of the System be no less than five
percent (5%)
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,000,000
Section 5.255. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 22
For interest payments on federal grant monies in accordance with the
Cash Management Improvement Act of 1990 and 1992, and any
other interest or penalties due to the federal government
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,400,000
From Office of Administration - Federal Fund (1135) .....................................................20,000
From Federal Surplus Property Fund (1407) ...................................................... 20,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,440,000
Section 5.260. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Budget
Stabilization Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .....................................................$30,000,000
Section 5.265. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, chargeable
to the Budget Reserve Fund and other funds, such amounts as
may be necessary for cash-flow assistance to various funds,
provided, however, that funds other than the Budget Reserve
Fund will not be used without prior notification to the
Commissioner of the Office of Administration, the Chair of the
Senate Appropriations Committee, and the Chair of the House
Budget Committee. Cash-flow assistance from funds other than
the Budget Reserve Fund shall only be transferred from May 15
to June 30 in any fiscal year, and an amount equal to the transfer
received, plus interest, shall be transferred back to the appropriate
Other Funds prior to June 30 of the fiscal year in which the
transfer was made
From Budget Reserve Fund and Other Funds to General Revenue Fund
(Various) ....................................................................................................$550,000,000
From Budget Reserve Fund and Other Funds to Other Funds (Various) ........... 100,000,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$650,000,000
Section 5.270. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as may be necessary for repayment of cash-flow
assistance to the Budget Reserve Fund and Other Funds,
provided, however, that the Commissioner of the Office of
Administration, the Chair of the Senate Appropriations
Committee, and the Chair of the House Budget Committee shall

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 23
be notified when repayment to funds, other than the Budget
Reserve Fund, has been made
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$550,000,000
From Other Funds (Various) ............................................................................... 100,000,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$650,000,000
Section 5.275. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as may be necessary for interest payments on cash-flow
assistance, to the Budget Reserve Fund and Other Funds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,500,000
From Other Funds (Various) ............................................................................... 500,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,000,000
Section 5.280. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as may be necessary for constitutional requirements of
the Budget Reserve Fund, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed from Sections 5.450, 5.465, and 5.510 to
this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,000,000
From Budget Reserve Fund (1100)..................................................................... 24,858,625
Total .........................................................................................................................$31,858,625
Section 5.285. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as may be necessary for corrections to fund balances
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$50,000
From Federal and Other Funds (Various) ........................................................... 750,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$800,000
Section 5.290. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, such
amounts as are necessary for allocation of costs to other funds in
support of the state’s central services performed by the Office of
Administration, the Department of Revenue, the Capitol Police,
the Elected Officials, and the General Assembly, to the General
Revenue Fund
From Other Funds (Various) ......................................................................................$9,923,817

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 24
Section 5.295. To the Office of Administration
For funding statewide membership dues
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$222,000
Section 5.300. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For paying the several counties of Missouri the amount that has been paid
into the State Treasury by the United States Treasury as a refund
from the leases of flood control lands, under the provisions of an
Act of Congress approved June 28, 1938, to be distributed to
certain counties in Missouri in accordance with the provisions of
state law, provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 5.295 and 5.300
From Office of Administration - Federal Fund (1135) ..............................................$1,800,000
Section 5.305. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For paying the several counties of Missouri the amount that has been paid
into the State Treasury by the United States Treasury as a refund
from the National Forest Reserve, under the provisions of an Act
of Congress approved June 28, 1938, to be distributed to certain
counties in Missouri, provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 5.295 and 5.300
From Office of Administration - Federal Fund (1135) ..............................................$6,500,000
Section 5.310. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payments to counties for county correctional prosecution
reimbursements pursuant to Sections 50.850 and 50.853, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$60,000
Section 5.315. To the Office of Administration
For distribution of state grants to regional planning commissions and
local governments as provided by Chapter 251, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$560,000
Section 5.450. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds for state employees and participating political
subdivisions to the OASDHI Contributions Fund, provided five

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 25
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between federal and other
funds within this section, and further provided twenty-five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
5.280
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$117,330,910
From Federal Funds (Various) ...................................................................................47,317,600
From Other Funds (Various) ............................................................................... 70,097,689
Total .......................................................................................................................$234,746,199
Section 5.455. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For transferring funds for employees of the State Highway Patrol to the
OASDHI Contributions Fund, said transfers to be administered
by the Office of Administration
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .......................$11,951,231
Section 5.460. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For the payment of OASDHI taxes for all state employees and for
participating political subdivisions within the state to the
Treasurer of the United States for compliance with current
provisions of Title 2 of the Federal Social Security Act, as
amended, in accordance with the agreement between the State
Social Security Administrator and the Secretary of the
Department of Health and Human Services, and for
administration of the agreement under Section 218 of the Social
Security Act which extends Social Security benefits to state and
local public employees
From OASDHI Contributions Fund (1702) ...........................................................$246,697,430
Section 5.465. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds for the state’s contribution to the Missouri State
Employees’ Retirement System to the State Retirement
Contributions Fund, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between federal and other funds within this section, and
further provided twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 5.280
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$491,376,000
From Federal Funds (Various) .................................................................................152,304,000

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 26
From Other Funds (Various) ............................................................................... 174,215,173
Total .......................................................................................................................$817,895,173
Section 5.470. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of the state’s contribution to the Missouri State Employees’
Retirement System, provided that no more than $16,987,706 shall
be expended on administration of the system, excluding
investment expenses
From State Retirement Contributions Fund (1701) ...............................................$817,895,173
Section 5.475. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of the state’s contribution to the Missouri State Employees’
Retirement System, for accelerated payments to the state
contribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$367,966,000
Section 5.480. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of retirement benefits to the Public School Retirement
System pursuant to Section 104.342, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$40,000
Section 5.485. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For transferring funds for state employees who are qualified participants
in the state Deferred Compensation Plan in accordance with
Section 105.927, RSMo, who contribute at least $25 per month,
and pursuant to Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code to
the Missouri State Employees’ Deferred Compensation Incentive
Plan Administration Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,678,528
From Federal Funds (Various) .....................................................................................6,316,575
From Other Funds (Various) ............................................................................... 12,531,888
Total .........................................................................................................................$34,526,991
Section 5.490. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 27
For transferring funds for the state’s contribution to the Missouri State
Employees’ Deferred Compensation Incentive Plan
Administration Fund for employees of the State Highway Patrol,
said transfers to be administered by the Office of Administration
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ............................$273,009
Section 5.495. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For the payment of funds credited by the state at a maximum rate of $75
per month per qualified participant in accordance with Section
105.927, RSMo, who contribute at least $25 per month, to
deferred compensation investment companies
From Missouri State Employees’ Deferred Compensation Incentive Plan
Administration Fund (1706) ........................................................................$34,800,000
Section 5.500. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For reimbursing the Division of Employment Security benefit account
for claims paid to former state employees for unemployment
insurance coverage and for related professional services,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between federal
and other funds within this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,430,053
From Federal Funds (Various) ........................................................................................784,000
From Other Funds (Various) ............................................................................... 1,616,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,830,053
Section 5.505. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For reimbursing the Division of Employment Security benefit account
for claims paid to former state employees of the Department of
Public Safety for unemployment insurance coverage and for
related professional services
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ............................$100,000
Section 5.510. To the Office of Administration
For transferring funds for the state’s contribution to the Missouri
Consolidated Health Care Plan to the Missouri Consolidated
Health Care Plan Benefit Fund, provided five percent (5%)

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 28
flexibility is allowed between federal and other funds within this
section, and further provided twenty-five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 5.280
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$338,809,405
From Federal Funds (Various) .................................................................................133,975,194
From Other Funds (Various) ............................................................................... 81,281,954
Total .......................................................................................................................$554,066,553
Section 5.515. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For payment of the state’s contribution to the Missouri Consolidated
Health Care Plan, provided that no more than $10,811,884 shall
be expended on administration of the plan, excluding third-party
administrator fees
From Missouri Consolidated Health Care Plan Benefit Fund (1765) ....................$554,066,553
Section 5.520. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For paying refunds for overpayment or erroneous payment of employee
withholding taxes
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$60,000
Section 5.525. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For providing voluntary life insurance
From Missouri State Employees’ Voluntary Life Insurance Fund (1910) ................$3,900,000
Section 5.530. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
For employee medical expense reimbursements reserve
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 5.535. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of Accounting
Personal Service for state payroll contingency
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$36,000
Section 5.540. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 29
For the provision of workers’ compensation benefits to state employees
through either a self-insurance program administered by the
Office of Administration and/or by contractual agreement with a
private carrier, and for administrative and legal expenses
authorized, in part, by Section 105.810, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$42,507,773
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ................................................... 1,200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$43,707,773
Section 5.545. To the Office of Administration
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, chargeable
to various funds, amounts paid from the General Revenue Fund
for workers’ compensation benefits provided to employees paid
from these other funds, to the General Revenue Fund, provided
five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between federal and other
funds within this section
From Federal Funds (Various) ...................................................................................$5,016,792
From Other Funds (Various) ............................................................................... 3,949,150
Total ...........................................................................................................................$8,965,942
Section 5.550. To the Office of Administration
For the Division of General Services
For workers’ compensation tax payments pursuant to Section 287.690,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,375,000
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ................................................... 125,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,500,000
PART 2
Section 5.2010. To the Office of Administration
The department shall prioritize existing enterprise agreements
when considering procurement or additional functionality for any
information technology for citizen engagement or supporting
state workers and programs. Prior to obligating the state to any
ongoing IT expense, including subscription or maintenance costs,
departments shall evaluate the state’s existing enterprise
agreements, including enterprise-wide licensing and other IT

CCS SCS HCS HB 5 30
assets. Prior to purchasing a new subscription for any
functionality described in this section, departments shall first
consider the state enterprise agreements in existence at the time
of procurement. If such an existing enterprise agreement is
appropriate for the functionality, it shall be given preference in
the procurement. Additionally, departments shall seek to adopt
functionality on any platform with an enterprise-wide agreement
with the state prior to incurring costs for additional platforms or
programs. All IT procurements processed through the Office of
Administration shall include a statement outlining compliance
with this section

PART 3
Section 5.3005. To the Office of Administration
In reference to section 5.220:
All revenue to the state derived incident to operations of facilities
financed through Missouri State Fair project bonds shall be
deposited into the State Fair Building Revolving Fund
Office of Administration Totals
General Revenue Fund (761.60 F.T.E.) .................................................................$469,162,613
Federal Funds (317.39 F.T.E.) .................................................................................136,725,144
Other Funds (856.47 F.T.E.) ............................................................................... 167,947,613
Total (1,935.46 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................$773,835,370
Employee Benefits Totals
General Revenue Fund ........................................................................................$1,010,583,670
Federal Funds ...........................................................................................................340,697,369
Other Funds ......................................................................................................... 357,291,944
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,708,572,983
